src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/N-joora_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - jǭra: # Noun 44 'eng /est järv/fin' - full paradigm
     jǭra+N+Sg+Nom: [jǭra, jōra]
     jǭra+N+Sg+Gen: [jǭra, jōra]
     jǭra+N+Sg+Par: jarrõ
     jǭra+N+Sg+Dat: [jǭran, jōran]
     jǭra+N+Sg+Ins: [jǭraks, jōraks]
     jǭra+N+Sg+Ill: jarrõ
     jǭra+N+Sg+Ela: [jǭrast, jōrast]
     jǭra+N+Pl+Nom: [jǭrad, jōrad]
     jǭra+N+Pl+Gen: [jǭrad, jōrad]
     jǭra+N+Pl+Par: [jǭridi, jōridi]
     jǭra+N+Pl+Dat: [jǭradõn, jōradõn]
     jǭra+N+Pl+Ins: [jǭradõks, jōradõks]
     jǭra+N+Pl+Ill: [jǭriž, jōriž]
     jǭra+N+Pl+Ela: [jǭrist, jōrist]
